Montana, session 2025, HB815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Oversight of school elections -- timeline -- role of school districts
and county election administrators. (1) The legislature intends that no later than July 1, 2029, all Montana
school elections will be administered by county election administrators.
(2) The office of public instruction, county superintendents of schools, and county election
administrators shall, no later than March 1, 2026, provide a report to the state administration and veterans'
affairs interim committee on the statewide plan for moving administration of school elections from school clerks
to county election administrators. The report must include:
(a) a description of the existing structure for administering school elections, including but not
limited to the types of school elections, current school election deadlines, and the current division of
responsibilities between the school clerks and the county election administrators;
(b) any financial and logistical concerns identified while developing the statewide plan;
(c) a timeline for the transition of duties; and
(d) any other information the office of public instruction, county superintendents of schools, and
county election administrators considers relevant to provide to the state administration and veterans' affairs
interim committee.
(3) The state administration and veterans' affairs interim committee shall consider the report and
make recommendations to the 70th legislature on statutory changes needed to implement the transition.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 815

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 815.1
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 815